Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.46.100

Duration of conservator's term—Rehabilitated state trust company—Management.

(1) The conservator shall serve for such time as is necessary to accomplish the purposes of the conservatorship as intended by this chapter.

(2) If rehabilitated, the rehabilitated state trust company shall be returned to preexisting management or new management under such conditions as are reasonable and necessary to prevent recurrence of the condition which occasioned the conservatorship.

[ 2019 c 389 s 89.]